Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2204
Expenditures; limitations; exception.

Nothing in the Local Government Miscellaneous Expenditure Act shall authorize the expenditure of public funds to pay for any expenses incurred by a spouse of an elected or appointed official, employee, or volunteer unless the spouse is also an elected or appointed official, employee, or volunteer of the local government. Nothing in the act shall be construed to limit, restrict, or prohibit the governing body of any local government from making any expenditure authorized by statute, ordinance, resolution, or home rule charter or pursuant to any authority granted by law, either express or implied, except to the extent that such statute, ordinance, resolution, home rule charter, or other grant of authority by law, express or implied, may conflict with the act.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 12.